Utah statutes.
53A-11-804.   Liability.

(1) (a)  Corporal punishment which would, but for this part, be considered to be reasonable discipline of a minor under Section 76-2-401 may not be used as a basis for any civil or criminal action.

(b)  A court of competent jurisdiction may take appropriate action against any employing entity if the court finds that the employing entity has not taken reasonable steps to enforce the provisions of this part.

(2)  Civil or criminal action may proceed without hindrance in the case of corporal punishment which would not be reasonable discipline under Sections 76-2-401 and 53A-11-805.



Enacted by Chapter 251, 1992 General Session

